Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Chapter 22. Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders

§ 93-22-1.
Short title.

The provisions of this chapter may be cited as the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Foreign protection order” means a protection order issued by a tribunal of another state.

“Issuing state” means the state whose tribunal issues a protection order.

“Mutual foreign protection order” means a foreign protection order that includes provisions issued in favor of both the protected individual seeking enforcement of the order and the respondent.

“Protected individual” means an individual protected by a protection order.

“Protection order” means an injunction or other order, issued by a tribunal under the domestic violence laws, family violence laws or anti-stalking laws of the issuing state, to prevent an individual from engaging in violent or threatening acts against, harassment of, contact or communication with, or physical proximity to another individual.

“Respondent” means the individual against whom enforcement of a protection order is sought.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes an American Indian tribe or band that has jurisdiction to issue protection orders.

“Tribunal” means a court, agency, or other entity authorized by law to issue or modify a protection order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-5.
Judicial enforcement of order.

A tribunal of this state shall enforce the terms of a valid foreign protection order, including terms that provide relief that a tribunal of this state would lack power to provide but for this section. A tribunal of this state shall enforce a valid foreign protection order issued by a tribunal, whether the order was obtained by independent action or in another proceeding, if it is an order issued in response to a complaint, petition, or motion filed by or on behalf of an individual seeking protection. A tribunal of this state may not enforce an order issued by a tribunal that does not recognize the standing of a protected individual to seek enforcement of the order. In a proceeding to enforce a foreign protection order, the tribunal shall follow the procedures of this state for the enforcement of protection orders.

A tribunal of this state shall enforce the provisions of a valid foreign protection order which governs custody and visitation. The custody and visitation provisions of the order must have been issued in accordance with the jurisdictional requirements governing the issuance of custody and visitation orders in the issuing state.

A tribunal of this state may not enforce under this chapter an order or provision of an order with respect to support.

A protection order is valid if it:

Identifies the protected individual and the respondent;

Is in effect at the time enforcement is being sought;

Was issued by a tribunal that had jurisdiction over the parties and matter under the law of the issuing state; and

Was issued after the respondent was provided with reasonable notice and had an opportunity to be heard before the tribunal issued the order or, in the case of an order ex parte, the respondent was given notice and afforded an opportunity to be heard within a reasonable time after the issuing of the order, consistent with the rights of the respondent to due process.

A person authorized under the law of this state to seek enforcement of a foreign protection order establishes a prima facie case for its validity by presenting an order valid on its face.

Absence of any of the criteria for validity of a foreign protection order is an affirmative defense in an action seeking enforcement of the order.

A tribunal of this state may enforce the provisions of a mutual foreign protection order which favor a respondent only if:

The respondent filed a written pleading seeking a protection order from the tribunal of the issuing state; and

The tribunal of the issuing state made specific findings in favor of the respondent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-7.
Nonjudicial enforcement of order.

A law enforcement officer of this state, upon determining that there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists and that the order has been violated, shall enforce the order as if it were the order of a tribunal of this state. Presentation of a protection order that identifies both the protected individual and the respondent, and on its face is in effect at the time enforcement is being sought, constitutes probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists. For the purposes of this section, the protection order may be inscribed on a tangible medium or may have been stored in an electronic or other medium if it is retrievable in perceivable form. Presentation of a certified copy of a protection order is not required for enforcement.

If the protection order is not presented, the officer may consider other information in determining whether there is probable cause to believe that a valid foreign protection order exists.

If a law enforcement officer of this state determines that an otherwise valid foreign protection order cannot be enforced because the respondent has not been notified or served with the order, the officer shall inform the respondent of the order and make a reasonable effort to serve the order upon the respondent. After informing the respondent and serving the order, the officer shall allow the respondent a reasonable opportunity to comply with the order before enforcing the order.

Registration or filing of an order in this state is not required for the enforcement of a valid foreign protection order under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-9.
Registration of order.

It is not required that any foreign protection order be registered in Mississippi; however, any individual may register a foreign protection order in this state on behalf of the individual or any protected person. To register a foreign protection order, an individual shall present a certified copy of the order to the chancery clerk’s office of any county in this state.

Upon presentation of a protection order, the chancery clerk shall enter the order into the Mississippi Protection Order Registry as provided in Section 93-21-25.

At the time of registration, an individual registering a foreign protection order shall file an affidavit by the protected individual that, to the best of the individual’s knowledge, the order is in effect at the time of the registration.

The failure to register a foreign protection order pursuant to the provisions of this section shall have no effect on the validity or enforceability of the order by Mississippi law enforcement or courts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 514, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 93-22-11.
Immunity.

This state or a local governmental agency, or a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, or any state or local governmental official acting in an official capacity, is immune from civil and criminal liability for an act or omission arising out of the registration or enforcement of a foreign protection order or the detention or arrest of an alleged violator of a foreign protection order if the act or omission is done in good faith in an effort to comply with this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-13.
Transitional provision.

This chapter applies to any protection order issued before July 1, 2004, including any continuing action for enforcement of a foreign protection order commenced before July 1, 2004. A request for enforcement of a foreign protection order brought on or after July 1, 2004 for violations of a foreign protection order occurring before July 1, 2004, is governed by the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-15.
Other remedies.

Pursuit of remedies under this chapter does not preclude a protected individual from pursuing other legal or equitable remedies against the respondent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-22-17.
Severability clause.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 566, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2004.